Utah statutes.
75-7-705.   Resignation of trustee.
(1)  A trustee may resign:
(a)  upon at least 30 days' notice to the qualified beneficiaries, the
settlor, if living, and all cotrustees; or
(b)  with the approval of the court.
(2)  In approving a resignation, the court may issue orders and impose
conditions reasonably necessary for the protection of the trust property.
(3)  Any liability of a resigning trustee or of any sureties on the trustee's
bond for acts or omissions of the trustee is not discharged or affected by the
trustee's resignation.
